Maine, session 132, LD484.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §83, sub-§9-A is enacted to read:
9-A. Community paramedicine. "Community paramedicine" means the practice by
an emergency medical services provider, primarily in an out-of-hospital setting, of
providing episodic patient evaluation, advice and treatment directed at preventing or
improving a particular medical condition.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §83, sub-§9-B is enacted to read:
9-B. Community paramedicine clinician. "Community paramedicine clinician"
means an emergency medical services person licensed under this chapter who has
completed specialized education and training to operate in an expanded role, providing
episodic, proactive and preventive health care services in nonemergency settings.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §83, sub-§9-C is enacted to read:
9-C. Community paramedicine service. "Community paramedicine service" means
an ambulance service or other nontransporting emergency medical service that provides
community paramedicine.
Page 1 - 132LR2084(03)

Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §86-A is enacted to read:
§86-A. Controlled substances
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an ambulance service,
nontransporting emergency medical service, community paramedicine service, emergency
medical services person and community paramedicine clinician that are licensed by the
board, or in the case of a community paramedicine service is authorized by the board, to
provide advanced emergency medical treatment or community paramedicine, in
accordance with rules adopted by the board, may procure, possess, administer and furnish
controlled substances as defined in Title 22, section 2383-B, subsection 3, paragraph A.
Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2084(03)